South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S144.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 44-61-100 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 44-61-100. The following are exempted from the provisions of this article: (A) ambulances owned and operated by the Federal Government; (B) a vehicle or vehicles, including associated personnel, rendering assistance to community ambulances in the case of a catastrophe when licensed ambulances in the locality are insufficient to render the required services; (C) the use of a privately or publicly owned vehicle, not ordinarily utilized in the transportation of persons who are sick, injured, or otherwise incapacitated and operating pursuant to Section 15-1-310 (Good Samaritan Act) in the prevention of loss of life and alleviation of suffering; (D) the use of out-of-state ambulance services and personnel to assist with treatment and transport of patients during a disaster or catastrophe when licensed services in the locality are insufficient to render the required services.; (E) a firefighter, regardless of whether the firefighter is licensed as an emergency medical service provider, may transport a patient suffering from a condition requiring an emergency response to a health care facility in a vehicle other than an ambulance if: (1) the appropriate emergency medical service provider is notified of the patient's condition requiring an emergency response; and (2) licensed ambulances in the locality are insufficient or unavailable to provide emergency medical services imminently at the patient's location. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----